Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB464.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 533 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) 1. "Caretaker of a dependent child" means:
a. A parent or legal guardian who has consistently assumed
responsibility for the housing, health, education, and safety of a
child prior to the parent or legal guardian's incarceration; or
b. A woman who has given birth to a child or remains pregnant
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
while awaiting her sentencing hearing.
2. A parent or legal guardian who has arranged for the temporary care
of the child in the home of a relative or other responsible adult shall
not for that reason be excluded from the definition of "caretaker of a
dependent child";
(b) "Dependent child" means a person:
1. Under eighteen (18) years of age; or
2. Between eighteen (18) and twenty-five (25) years of age for whom a
guardian, limited guardian, conservator, or limited conservator has
been appointed under KRS 387.600; and
(3) "Family impact statement" means a written statement to the court prior to
sentencing, which may contain written documentation from family and
community members about the impact the defendant's incarceration may
have on the dependent child.
(2) Upon a motion by the defendant, the court shall consider the defendant's status
as a caretaker of a dependent child before imposing a sentence following a
conviction for a felony offense unless:
(a) The defendant is classified as a violent offender under KRS 439.3401;
(b) The defendant has been convicted of an offense that:
1. Involved the use, attempted use, or threat of physical force upon; or
2. Wantonly endangered;
a person and the relationship between the defendant and the person meets
the definition of a family member or member of an unmarried couple as
defined in KRS 403.720, or is or has been in a dating relationship as
defined in KRS 456.010;
(c) The victim is a child; or
(d) A statute prohibits probation, shock probation, or conditional discharge for
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
that offense.
(3) (a) The court shall make written findings concerning a defendant's status as a
caretaker of a dependent child. Upon a finding that a defendant is a
caretaker of a dependent child, the court shall consider an alternative
sentence.
(b) The determination of the court concerning a defendant's status as a
caretaker of a dependent child under paragraph (a) of this subsection shall
apply only to the pending matter and in any subsequent proceeding shall
not be:
1. Admissible as evidence; or
2. Determinative of caretaker status.
(4) When determining whether to impose an alternative sentence under subsection
(3) of this section, the court shall consider:
(a) The criminal history of the defendant;
(b) The seriousness of the offense;
(c) Whether the offense was against persons or property, with greater weight
given to offenses against persons;
(d) Whether the defendant has an administrative finding of child abuse or
neglect as defined in KRS 160.380;
(e) Whether the defendant is a registered sex offender under KRS 17.510;
(f) The likelihood the defendant will reoffend and whether the likelihood might
be reduced by inpatient or outpatient treatment for substance use disorder;
(g) The age of the dependent child, with strong consideration given to avoid
disruption to the caregiving of an infant, preschool, or school-age
dependent child;
(h) Whether the defendant is breastfeeding the dependent child;
(i) The role of the defendant in the day-to-day educational and medical needs
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
of the dependent child;
(j) Any special medical, educational, or psychological needs of the dependent
child;
(k) The role of the defendant in the financial support of the dependent child;
and
(l) The relationship of the defendant and the dependent child.
(5) The defendant shall have the right to present an alternative sentencing plan and
a family impact statement to the court.
(6) If the court determines that a defendant is a caretaker of a dependent child and
imposes an alternative sentence, the court may, in addition to other reasonable
conditions, require the defendant to participate in programs or services with a
focus on parent-child unity or supporting the parent-child relationship, including
but not limited to:
(a) Substance use disorder treatment and prevention services;
(b) Domestic violence education and prevention services;
(c) Child abuse treatment and prevention services;
(d) Parenting classes;
(e) Anger management;
(f) Vocational and educational training;
(g) Targeted case management services that assist with access to transportation
and affordable and safe housing;
(h) Literacy and financial literacy training;
(i) Individual counseling and therapy:
(j) Family counseling when there is no known history of family or intimate
partner violence;
(k) Referral to local domestic violence resources for voluntary participation;
and
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
(l) Restorative practices designed to make the participant accountable to the
victim, when there is an identified victim and when it is safe to do so.
(7) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a court that imposes an alternative
sentence under this section shall not require the defendant to commit to a term of
confinement unless the defendant fails to adhere to or complete the conditions of
the alternative sentence. If the defendant violates the terms or conditions of the
alternative sentence, the court may modify or revoke the alternative sentence and
commit the defendant to an institution.
Section 2. KRS 610.340 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Unless a specific provision of KRS Chapters 600 to 645 specifies otherwise,
all juvenile court records of any nature generated pursuant to KRS Chapters
600 to 645 by any agency or instrumentality, public or private, shall be
deemed to be confidential and shall not be disclosed except to the child,
parent, victims, or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing
pursuant to KRS 610.070 unless ordered by the court for good cause.
(b) Juvenile court records which contain information pertaining to arrests,
petitions, adjudications, and dispositions of a child may be disclosed to
victims or other persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant
to KRS 610.070.
(c) Release of the child's treatment, medical, mental, or psychological records is
prohibited unless presented as evidence in Circuit Court. Any records
resulting from the child's prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or Title IV-
B of the Federal Social Security Act shall not be disclosed to victims or other
persons authorized to attend a juvenile court hearing pursuant to KRS
610.070.
(d) Victim access under this subsection to juvenile court records shall include
access to records of adjudications that occurred prior to July 15, 1998.
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
(2) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to public officers or employees
engaged in the investigation of and in the prosecution of cases under KRS Chapters
600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any record obtained
pursuant to this subsection shall be [used ]for official use only, shall not be
disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records
Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(3) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to any peace officer, as defined in
KRS 446.010, who is engaged in the investigation or prosecution of cases under
KRS Chapters 600 to 645 or other portions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes. Any
record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be [used ]for official use only,
shall not be disclosed publicly, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open
Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(4) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to employees of the Department of
Juvenile Justice or cabinet or its designees responsible for any services under KRS
Chapters 600 to 645 or to attorneys for parties involved in actions relating to KRS
Chapters 600 to 645 or other prosecutions authorized by the Kentucky Revised
Statutes.
(5) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to records disclosed pursuant to
KRS 610.320 or to public or private elementary and secondary school
administrative, transportation, and counseling personnel, to any teacher or school
employee with whom the student may come in contact, or to persons entitled to
have juvenile records under KRS 610.345, if the possession and use of the records
is in compliance with [the provisions of ]KRS 610.345 and this section.
(6) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to employees of local law
enforcement agencies, the Department of Kentucky State Police, or the Federal
Bureau of Investigation engaged in conducting background checks for the sole
purpose of identifying and providing potentially disqualifying juvenile public
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
offense records to the National Instant Criminal Background Check System
pursuant to Div. A, Title II, Sec. 12001(a) of the Bipartisan Safer Communities Act,
Pub. L. No. 117-159. Notwithstanding KRS 635.040, an adjudication for a public
offense is a conviction of a crime for purposes of 18 U.S.C. sec. 922(d)(1), (3), or
(9). Any public offense record obtained pursuant to this subsection shall be [used
]for official use only, not be disclosed publicly, and be exempt from disclosure
under the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
(7) (a) [The provisions of ]This section shall not apply to records or proceedings in
any case in which a child has made an admission to or been adjudicated for a
violent felony offense as defined in KRS 532.200 until the expiration of a
three (3) year period from the date of admission or adjudication.
(b) If the child has not received any additional public offense convictions during
the three (3) year period from the date of admission or adjudication, all
records in the case shall be automatically sealed and shall not be disclosed
consistent with [the provisions of ]this section.
(c) As used in this subsection, "admission" means a formal admission in a case,
on the record, upon the waiving of an adjudication hearing.
(8) This section shall not apply to courts determining whether to impose an
alternative sentence under Section 1 of this Act. Any record obtained pursuant to
this subsection shall be for official use only, shall not be disclosed publicly, and
shall be exempt from disclosure under the Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to
61.884.
(9) A[No] person, including school personnel, shall not disclose any confidential record
or any information contained therein except as permitted by this section or
another[other specific] section of KRS Chapters 600 to 645, or except as permitted
by [specific ]order of the court.
(10)[(9)] A[No] person, including school personnel, authorized to obtain records
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1273
pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall not obtain or attempt to obtain
confidential records to which he or she is not entitled or for purposes for which he
or she is not permitted to obtain them pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(11)[(10)] A[No] person, including school personnel, not authorized to obtain records
pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 shall not obtain or attempt to obtain records
which are made confidential pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 except upon
[proper ]motion to a court of competent jurisdiction.
(12)[(11)] A[No] person shall not destroy or attempt to destroy any record required to be
kept pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 unless the destruction is permitted
pursuant to KRS Chapters 600 to 645 and is authorized by the court upon [proper
]motion and good cause for the destruction being shown.
(13)[(12)] As used in this section the term "KRS Chapters 600 to 645" includes any
administrative regulations which are [lawfully ]promulgated in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A and as authorized under[pursuant to] KRS Chapters 600 to 645.
(14)[(13)] [Nothing in ]This section shall not be construed to prohibit a crime victim
from speaking publicly after the adjudication about his or her case on matters
within his or her knowledge or on matters disclosed to the victim during any aspect
of a juvenile court proceeding.
Section 3. This Act may be cited as the Family Preservation and Accountability
Act.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/20/2026 12:33 PM Jacketed